Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5078YC (1) 91 ms/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 331.212, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . k. Approval of board proceedings to be 3 published pursuant to section 349.18. 4 Sec. 2. Section 331.504, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 6. Furnish a copy of the proceedings of the board , as 7 approved by the board, required to be published as provided in 8 section 349.18 . 9 Sec. 3. Section 349.18, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 1. a. All proceedings of each regular, adjourned, or 12 special meeting of a board of supervisors, including the 13 schedule of bills allowed, shall be published immediately after 14 the adjournment of the meeting. 15 b. All proceedings must be approved by the board of 16 supervisors before publication. Approval must occur prior to 17 adjournment of the meeting. The following information shall be 18 added to the proceedings after approval: 19 (1) The approval of the proceedings. 20 (2) The adjournment of the meeting. 21